Utah statutes.
26-20-5.   False statements or false representations relating to qualification of health institution or facility prohibited -- Felony.

(1)  A person may not knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly make, induce, or seek to induce, the making of a false statement or false representation of a material fact with respect to the conditions or operation of an institution or facility in order that the institution or facility may qualify, upon initial certification or upon recertification, as a hospital, skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, or home health agency.

(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a second degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 48, 2007 General Session

